src/adj-smj-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ========================================================================== !
!                      Lule Sámi adjective lexicon                           !
! ========================================================================== !

LEXICON LEXATTR  ! This lexicon is here to give the tags to the compounding
 +A+Attr:%> ATTR ; ! attributive forms.

LEXICON At !NB Have commented out everything except K ; here to avoid strange compounds like -šlailágán etc. Attr. that can be compounded with NAMAT etc are redirected to LEXATTR
+A+Attr:%> K ;
!+A+Attr: NAMÁK ;
!+A+Attr: R ;                    

LEXICON VINJO- 
+A+Attr: NAMÁK ; 
+A+Attr:%> R ; 

LEXICON NAMÁK
+Der1+Der/nálán:#»nálán AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/madák:#»madág9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/maduk:#»madug9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/juolgak:#»juolgag9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/luottak:#»luottag9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/lágásj:#»lágátj LÁGÁSJ ;
+Der1+Der/lágán:#»lágán LÁGÁSJ ;
+Der1+Der/suttak:#»suttag9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/uvsuk:#»uvsug9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/jienak:#»jienag9 AGAdj "voiced A" ;
+Der1+Der/rattak:#»rattag9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/hekkak:#»hekkag9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/åjvak:#»åjvag9 AGAdj "headed A" ;
+Der1+Der/belak:#»belag9 AGAdj "sided A" ;
+Der1+Der/sijduk:#»sijdug9 AGAdj "sided A" ;
+Der1+Der/giedak:#»giedag9 AGAdj "handed A" ;
+Der1+Der/gielak:#»gielag9 AGAdj "-ish A" ;
+Der1+Der/muoduk:#»muodug9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/tjiluk:#»tjilug9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/varák:#»varág9 AGAdj "blooded A" ;
+Der1+Der/báguk:#»bágug9 AGAdj "worded A" ;
+Der1+Der/nálak:#»nálag9 AGAdj "lineaged A" ;
+Der1+Der/rabdak:#»rabdag9 AGAdj "edged A" ;
+Der1+Der/rávak:#»rávag9 AGAdj "edged A" ;
+Der1+Der/ájvuk:#»ájvug9 AGAdj "edged A" ;
+Der1+Der/gárvok:#»gárvog9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/gárvuk:#»gárvug9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/såjak:#»såjag9 AGAdj "winged A" ;
+Der1+Der/giesjkak:#»giesjkag9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/bának:#»bánag9 AGAdj "toothed A" ;
+Der1+Der/njálmak:#»njálmag9 AGAdj "mouthed A" ;
+Der1+Der/nierak:#»nierag9 AGAdj "cheeked A" ;
+Der1+Der/merkak:#»merkag9 AGAdj "marked A" ;
+Der1+Der/suorgak:#»suorgag9 AGAdj "forked A" ;
+Der1+Der/suorak:#»suorag9 AGAdj "forked A" ;
+Der1+Der/gattsak:#»gattsag9 AGAdj "nailed A" ;
+Der1+Der/sejbak:#»sejbag9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/sejnak:#»sejnag9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/hájak:#»hájag9 AGAdj "smelled A" ;
+Der1+Der/habsak:#»habsag9 AGAdj "smelled A" ;
+Der1+Der/hápsak:#»hápsag9 AGAdj "smelled A" ;
+Der1+Der/hábjak:#»hábjag9 AGAdj "smelled A" ;
+Der1+Der/sáv0vak:#»sáv'vag9 AGAdj "seamed A" ;
+Der1+Der/namák:#»namág9 AGAdj "named A" ;
+Der1+Der/lanják:#»lanjág9 AGAdj "roomed A" ;
+Der1+Der/vuoduk:#»vuodug9 AGAdj "bottomed A" ;
+Der1+Der/hámak:#»hámag9 AGAdj "formed A" ;
+Der1+Der/linnjak:#»linnjag9 AGAdj "lined A" ;
+Der1+Der/lijkak:#»lijkag9 AGAdj "skinned A" ;
+Der1+Der/dávtak:#»dávtag9 AGAdj "bed A" ;
+Der1+Der/tjårvak:#»tjårvag9 AGAdj "horned A" ;
+Der1+Der/getjak:#»getjag9 AGAdj "tipped A" ;
+Der1+Der/beljak:#»beljag9 AGAdj "eared A" ;
+Der1+Der/tjuvdak:#»tjuvdag9 AGAdj "fingered A" ;
+Der1+Der/dábak:#»dábag9 AGAdj "mannered A" ;
+Der1+Der/tjiegak:#»tjiegag9 AGAdj "cornered A" ;
+Der1+Der/gerdak:#»gerdag9 AGAdj "layered A" ;
+Der1+Der/vuobdak:#»vuobdag9 AGAdj "haired A" ;
+Der1+Der/uvsak:#»uvsag9 AGAdj "doored A" ;
+Der1+Der/ivnak:#»ivnag9 AGAdj "coloured A" ;
+Der1+Der/ferjak:#»ferjag9 AGAdj "coloured A" ;
+Der1+Der/bájnuk:#»bájnug9 AGAdj "coloured A" ;
+Der1+Der/luonduk:#»luondug9 AGAdj "natured A" ;
+Der1+Der/dávdak:#»dávdag9 AGAdj "diseased A" ;
+Der1+Der/jergak:#»jergag9 AGAdj "sensed A" ;
+Der1+Der/mielak:#»mielag9 AGAdj "sensed A" ;
+Der1+Der/jiermak:#»jiermag9 AGAdj "sensed A" ;
+Der1+Der/njunjak:#»njunjag9 AGAdj "nosed A" ;
+Der1+Der/guovluk:#»guovlug9 AGAdj "orientated A" ;
+Der1+Der/dáfuk:#»dáfug9 AGAdj "faceted A" ;
+Der1+Der/vájmuk:#»vájmug9 AGAdj "hearted A" ;
+Der1+Der/lahkak:#»lahkag9 AGAdj "parted A" ;
+Der1+Der/åsak:#»åsag9 AGAdj "parted A" ;
+Der1+Der/garák:#»garág9 AGAdj "crusted A" ;
+Der1+Der/tjuolmak:#»tjuolmag9 AGAdj "knotted A" ;
+Der1+Der/tjålak:#»tjålag9 AGAdj "gutted A" ;
+Der1+Der/segak:#»segag9 AGAdj "mixed A" ;
+Der1+Der/tjalmak:#»tjalmag9 AGAdj "eyed A" ;
+Der1+Der/juvlak:#»juvlag9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/vigák:#»vigág9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/girjak:#»girjag9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/stával:#»stávval STÁVAL ;
+Der1+Der/agák:#»agág9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/jagák:#»jagág9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/bájnok:#»bájnog9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/muoduk:#»muodug9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/sjattuk:#»sjattug9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/tjuodak:#»tjuodag9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/láhkásasj:#»láhkásadtj Ahkásasj ;
+Der1+Der/sláj:#»sláj At ;


LEXICON SASJ !XXXFROM NUMERALS
+Der1+Der/ahkásasj:#»ahkásadtj Ahkásasj ;
+Der1+Der/biejvvásasj:#»biejvvásadtj Ahkásasj ;
+Der1+Der/ájggásasj:#»ájggásadtj Ahkásasj ;
+Der1+Der/jahkásasj:#»jahkásadtj Ahkásasj ;
+Der1+Der/gærddásasj:#»gærddásadtj Ahkásasj ;
+Der1+Der/tjuohtásasj:#»tjuohtásadtj Ahkásasj ;
+Der1+Der/gielalasj:#»gielaladtj Ahkásasj ;
+Der1+Der/klássak:#»klássag9 AGAdj ;
+Der1+Der/tijmmasasj:#»tijmmasadtj AGAdj ;

!LEXICON NAMMASAS  !FROM NAMES
!+Der/nammasasj:#»nammasadtj Ahkásasj ;
!Not used.

LEXICON Adjective
 bihko VINJO- ;
 bivtjo VINJO- ;
 boajto VINJO- ;
 boasto VINJO- ;
 bånjo VINJO- ;
 duolbo VINJO- ;
 fuono+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:fuono VINJO-; !
 gihtjo VINJO- ;
 goasste VINJO- ;
 goavko VINJO- ;
 goavnjo VINJO- ;
 guvnjo VINJO- ;
 gálgo VINJO- ;
 gávo VINJO- ;
 gávvo+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:gávvo VINJO-; !
 gåjkke VINJO- ;
 gåmo VINJO- ;
 hállo VINJO- ;
 hæjtto+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:hæjtto VINJO-; !
 joajmo VINJO- ;
 joarmo VINJO- ;
 loavko VINJO- ;
 luoppo VINJO- ;
 máhtso VINJO- ;
 måjo+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:måjo VINJO-; !
 måtso VINJO- ;
 måttso VINJO- ;
 oabme VINJO- ;
 oassto VINJO- ;
 rimsso VINJO- ;
 roahko VINJO- ;
 ruohko VINJO- ;
 råtjo VINJO- ;
 sjávo+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:sjávo VINJO-; !
 skielgo+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:skielgo VINJO-; !
 såjo VINJO- ;
 såssnå VINJO- ;
 særro+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:særro VINJO-; !
 tjuolo VINJO- ;
 tjuottjo+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:tjuottjo VINJO-; !
 tjurvvo VINJO- ;
 tjåhko VINJO- ;
 tjævto VINJO- ;
 tsaggo VINJO- ;
 tsakko VINJO- ;
 tsáptso+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:tsáptso VINJO-; !
 tsækko VINJO- ;
 vinjo VINJO- ;
 vællo+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:vællo VINJO-; !
ajeksiehke:ajeksiek At ;
ajiksiehke:ajiksiek At ;
almma:almma LEXATTR ;
alusj LEXATTR ;
anádahkes LEXATTR ; 
anár#sáme#giel At ;
astos LEXATTR ; 
avtelasj:avteladtj At ;
 bahá:bahá LEXATTR ;  !Irregular attr. form
basske:baskes LEXATTR ; 
beraj#giel At ;
bidum#sáme#giel At ;
biednigahtes LEXATTR ; 
bihtám#sáme#giel At ;
bitjes:bitjes LEXATTR ; 
boahkke LEXATTR ; 
boahtte At ;
buorreluonduk:buorreluondugis At ;
buottso LEXATTR ;
bálkádis LEXATTR ;
bávtak:bávtagis LEXATTR ;
bådos LEXATTR ; 
bårjo LEXATTR ;
bæjválasj LEXATTR ;
bæjválasj#giel At ;
dallusj LEXATTR ;
davvi#sáme#giel At ;
davásj LEXATTR ;
demonstratijvva:demonstratijva LEXATTR ;
dihka LEXATTR ;
dujska#giel At ;
duolbbat:duolbba LEXATTR ;
duolla LEXATTR ;
dábma LEXATTR ; 
 dálasj+Use/Sub:dálasj LEXATTR; !
dárbulis LEXATTR ;
dáro#giel At ;
dåbbilij LEXATTR ;
dåjagásj LEXATTR ;
dæddo^stávval:dæddo^stávvalis At ;
dættodis LEXATTR ;
enemus LEXATTR ;
esti#giel At ;
fránska#giel At ;
fáhka#giel At ;
fássta LEXATTR ;
galmmavarák:galmmavarágis At ;
giednat:gienis LEXATTR ;
giehppe:giehppes LEXATTR ; 
giehtos LEXATTR ;
gihtjo LEXATTR ;
girjje#dáro#giel At ;
girjje#giel At ;
goalmaktes LEXATTR ;
goavnjo LEXATTR ;
grehka#giel At ;
guhkke:guhkes LEXATTR ; 
gunnot At ;
guojna#giel At ;
guoládak#sáme#giel At ;
guovte^stávval:guovte^stávvalis At ;
guovtegávnak:guovtegávnagis At ;
guovtesuorak:guovtesuoragis At ;
gurák:gurák LEXATTR ; 
gálgo LEXATTR ;
gáregis LEXATTR ;
gárjjel#giel At ;
gárŋok LEXATTR ;
gávvo LEXATTR ;
gåbduk:gåbdå LEXATTR ;
gålldå#sáme#giel At ;
gåmbal:gåmbalis LEXATTR ;
gåmosjævnnjat:gåmosjievnnjis LEXATTR ;
gårrat:goarris LEXATTR ;
gærmmat:giermmis LEXATTR ;
hebrea#giel At ;
helbak:hebalgis LEXATTR ; 
hiebagis LEXATTR ; 
hánessiehke:hánessiek At ;
hárpodis LEXATTR ;
hållam#giel At ;
iedne#giel At ;
iednedis LEXATTR ; 
ienep LEXATTR ;
iesj#stivrrim At ;
iesj#válljidum At ;
iesj#åjvak:iesj#åjvagis At ; 
ietjas#åjvak:ietjas#åjvagis At ; 
ieŋŋgils#giel At ;
ieŋŋgis#giel At ;
ieŋŋils#giel At ;
ieŋŋis#giel At ;
ihkeva LEXATTR ;
ihkeven LEXATTR ;
ihkálasj LEXATTR ;
illos LEXATTR ; 
jakker LEXATTR ;
jasska LEXATTR ;
joasos LEXATTR ;
juhkalis LEXATTR ; 
julev#sáme#giel At ;
jáhkedahtes LEXATTR ;
jámedihke LEXATTR ;
jålbbåt:jålbbis LEXATTR ;
jårbbå LEXATTR ;
jårbbåt:jårbbå LEXATTR ;
kråvvå LEXATTR ;
lassjes LEXATTR ; 
latijna#giel At ;
liekkos LEXATTR ;
loamssje LEXATTR ;
lulle#sáme#giel At ;
lulusj LEXATTR ;
luojtos LEXATTR ;
luván LEXATTR ;
láhka#mierredum At ;
lájtos LEXATTR ; 
lågenárre:lågenár LEXATTR ;
lånjok:låddnjis LEXATTR ;
merra#sáme#giel At ;
mieredis LEXATTR ; 
murkkidum At ;
mánnásiehke:mánnásiek At ;
mánáj#giel At ;
másjket:mássjkis LEXATTR ;
mållåt:mållis LEXATTR ; 
nalás LEXATTR ;
nasjonal At ;
nasjonál At ;
nasjunal At ;
nasjunál At ;
njago LEXATTR ;
njuolgga LEXATTR ;
njuoras:njuorris LEXATTR ;
noajdes LEXATTR ; 
nubbe#giel At ;
nuortta#sáme#giel At ;
nállosjit LEXATTR ;
oadne:åni LEXATTR ;
oalle LEXATTR ;
oarjjel#sáme#giel At ;
oarjjelij#sáme#giel At ;
rievsak#giel At ;
rievtes LEXATTR ;
rihtso LEXATTR ; 
rijka#dajva#giel At ;
rijka#giel At ;
roma#giel At ;
ruodná LEXATTR ; 
ruossja#giel At ;
ruostadis LEXATTR ;
rádálasj:rádális LEXATTR ;
ráhpat:ráhppis LEXATTR ; 
rákko LEXATTR ;
rámát#giel At ;
råtjo LEXATTR ;
sevvam#giel At ;
siegge:sekka LEXATTR ;
sijdadis LEXATTR ; 
sijdda#giel At ;
sirŋas:sirŋa LEXATTR ;
sisŋásj LEXATTR ;
sjerrat:sjierris LEXATTR ;
sjkebtjas:sjkæbttja LEXATTR ;
sjnjibbalis LEXATTR ;
sjnjutjo LEXATTR ;
sjunjo LEXATTR ; 
skandus LEXATTR ; 
skielgok:skielgok LEXATTR ; 
skárbbis LEXATTR ;
sliggot:sliggo LEXATTR ;
sládjalåk LEXATTR ;
smávve:smáv LEXATTR ;
snarre LEXATTR ; 
snjurtjuk:snjurtjuk LEXATTR ;
snávggat:snávgges LEXATTR ; 
spánska#giel At ;
stajggat:stajgas LEXATTR ; 
stuorre:stuor LEXATTR ; 
stæntjo LEXATTR ;
suoma#dáro#giel At ;
suoma#giel At ;
suvres:suvra LEXATTR ;
svieriga LEXATTR ;
irlánda LEXATTR ;
syria-fenikia At ;
sáme LEXATTR ;
 sáme#giel At ; ! check this! XXX gæhttjaladdat sámegiel bágoj 
sárnnediddjesiehke:sárnnediddjesek At ;
sárnnediddjesiehke:sárnnediddjesiek At ;
særro LEXATTR ; 
tjargga LEXATTR ;
tjiegossiek At ;
tjierggat:tjierggis LEXATTR ; 
tjiesskis LEXATTR ;
tjoahkke LEXATTR ;
tjuorak+A+Attr:tjuorak LEXATTR ;
tjáhtje#dulvvadum At ;
tjáhtjesiehke:tjáhtjesiek At ;
tjállem#giel At ;
tjáres:tjárris LEXATTR ; 
tjævto LEXATTR ;
tsoahkke LEXATTR ;
tsåhkevigák:tsåhkevigágis At ;
ubbmem#sáme#giel At ;
uhttse:uhtses LEXATTR ; 
unnep#lågo#giel At ;
vahágis LEXATTR ;
vieres#giel At ;
viesso#varák:viesso#varák LEXATTR ; 
visskat:visská LEXATTR ;
vuodo#dáro#giel At ;
vuodo#giel At ;
vuodo#suoma#giel At ;
vuodo#sáme#giel At ;
vuona#dáro#giel At ;
vuorassiehke:vuorassiek At ;
vuorassiek At ;
vuostas#giel At ;
vuostasj#giel At ;
vuostasj#riegádim+A+Attr:vuostasj#riegádim At ;
vuostasj#riegádum+A+Attr:vuostasj#riegádum At ;
vuovnná:vuovnná LEXATTR ; 
vájmo#giel At ;
várre#lahka LEXATTR ;
vælo LEXATTR ; 
ájgge#guovddelis LEXATTR ;
ájgge#rádjodum At ;
ájnna LEXATTR ;
ájnna#riegadim At ; 
álggo#giel At ;
árgga#giel At ;
árra LEXATTR ;
åbbå LEXATTR ;
ådå#dáro#giel At ;
ådå#vuona#giel At ;
åjdå LEXATTR ;
åvdusj LEXATTR ;
